Louisiana, session 2026, SB164.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1017.1(6) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1017.1. Definitions
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words and
terms, when used in this Part, shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(6) "First responder" means a volunteer engaged in activities involving the
Governor's Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness pursuant to
R.S. 29:721 et seq., and first responders as defined in R.S. 29:723 including but not
limited to medical personnel, emergency and medical technicians, volunteer firemen,
auxiliary law enforcement officers, state agency essential workers, emergency
service dispatchers, emergency response operators, electrical linemen as defined by
R.S. 29:723, public works employees as defined in R.S. 29:723, and members of
the Civil Air Patrol.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 29:739(C) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 29:723(21) is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 164 ENROLLED
§723. Definitions
As used in this Chapter:
* * *
(21)(a) "Public works employee" means an employee of a municipal or
parish public works department who is responsible for the maintenance and
improvement of municipal or parish infrastructure. Public works employees
shall be considered first responders only in instances involving emergencies as
declared by the governor pursuant to R.S. 29:721 et seq.
(b) The term "first responder" may be displayed on the uniform of a
public works employee.
* * *
§739. Intrastate Mutual Aid Compact
* * *
C. Definitions
As used in this Section, "first responder" refers to those individuals who in
the early stages of an incident are responsible for the protection and preservation of
life, property, evidence, and the environment, including emergency response
providers as defined in Section 2 of the Homeland Security Act of 2002, 6 U.S.C.
101, as well as emergency management, public health, clinical care, public works,
and other skilled support personnel, such as equipment operators, and electrical
linemen, and public works employees that provide immediate support services
during prevention, response, and recovery operations consistent with Homeland
Security Presidential Directive 8.
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall be known as and may be cited as the "Shelby LaSalle Act".
Section 4. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
renumber the definitions in R.S. 29:723 to ensure that the definitions are in alphabetical
order.
Section 5. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 164 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.